Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 1
URBAN RENEWAL

Cross references:

For slum clearance and municipal housing authorities, see part 7 of article 32, article 55, and article 56 of title 24 and article 4 of title 29.

Law reviews:

For article, "A Brief Overview of Recent

C

hanges in

C

olorado's Urban Renewal Law", see 33 Colo. Law. 99 (Sept. 2004).

31-25-101. Short title.

This part 1 shall be known and may be cited as the "Urban Renewal Law".

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1158, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-101 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-102. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that there exist in municipalities of this state slum and blighted areas which constitute a serious and growing menace, injurious to the public health, safety, morals, and welfare of the residents of the state in general and of the municipalities thereof; that the existence of such areas contributes substantially to the spread of disease and crime, constitutes an economic and social liability, substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of municipalities, retards the provision of housing accommodations, aggravates traffic problems and impairs or arrests the elimination of traffic hazards and the improvement of traffic facilities; and that the prevention and elimination of slums and blight is a matter of public policy and statewide concern in order that the state and its municipalities shall not continue to be endangered by areas which are focal centers of disease, promote juvenile delinquency, and consume an excessive proportion of its revenues because of the extra services required for police, fire, accident, hospitalization, and other forms of public protection, services, and facilities.

The general assembly further finds and declares that certain slum or blighted areas, or portions thereof, may require acquisition, clearance, and disposition subject to use restrictions, as provided in this part 1, since the prevailing conditions therein may make impracticable the reclamation of the area by conservation or rehabilitation; that other slum or blighted areas, or portions thereof, through the means provided in this part 1, may be susceptible of conservation or rehabilitation in such a manner that the conditions and evils enumerated in this section may be eliminated, remedied, or prevented; and that salvable slum and blighted areas can be conserved and rehabilitated through appropriate public action, as authorized or contemplated in this part 1, and the cooperation and voluntary action of the owners and tenants of property in such areas.

The general assembly further finds and declares that the powers conferred by this part 1 are for public uses and purposes for which public money may be expended and the police power exercised and that the necessity in the public interest for the provisions enacted in this part 1 is declared as a matter of legislative determination.

The general assembly further finds and declares that:

Urban renewal areas created for the purposes described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall not include agricultural land except in connection with the limited circumstances described in this part 1; and

The inclusion of agricultural land within urban renewal areas is a matter of statewide concern.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1158, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(4) added, (HB 10-1107), ch. 89, p. 298, § 1, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-102 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-103. Definitions.

As used in this part 1, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Agricultural land" means any one parcel of land or any two or more contiguous parcels of land that, regardless of the uses for which the land has been zoned, has been classified by the county assessor as agricultural land for purposes of the levying and collection of property tax pursuant to sections 39-1-102 (1.6)(a) and 39-1-103 (5)(a), C.R.S., at any time during the five-year period prior to the date of adoption of an urban renewal plan or any modification of such a plan.

"Blighted area" means an area that, in its present condition and use and, by reason of the presence of at least four of the following factors, substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of the municipality, retards the provision of housing accommodations, or constitutes an economic or social liability, and is a menace to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare:

Slum, deteriorated, or deteriorating structures;

Predominance of defective or inadequate street layout;

Faulty lot layout in relation to size, adequacy, accessibility, or usefulness;

Unsanitary or unsafe conditions;

Deterioration of site or other improvements;

Unusual topography or inadequate public improvements or utilities;

Defective or unusual conditions of title rendering the title nonmarketable;

The existence of conditions that endanger life or property by fire or other causes;

Buildings that are unsafe or unhealthy for persons to live or work in because of building code violations, dilapidation, deterioration, defective design, physical construction, or faulty or inadequate facilities;

Environmental contamination of buildings or property;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1745, § 3, effective June 4, 2004.)

The existence of health, safety, or welfare factors requiring high levels of municipal services or substantial physical underutilization or vacancy of sites, buildings, or other improvements; or

If there is no objection by the property owner or owners and the tenant or tenants of such owner or owners, if any, to the inclusion of such property in an urban renewal area, "blighted area" also means an area that, in its present condition and use and, by reason of the presence of any one of the factors specified in paragraphs (a) to (k.5) of this subsection (2), substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of the municipality, retards the provision of housing accommodations, or constitutes an economic or social liability, and is a menace to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare. For purposes of this paragraph (l), the fact that an owner of an interest in such property does not object to the inclusion of such property in the urban renewal area does not mean that the owner has waived any rights of such owner in connection with laws governing condemnation.

"Bonds" means any bonds (including refunding bonds), notes, interim certificates or receipts, temporary bonds, certificates of indebtedness, debentures, or other obligations.

(3.1) "Brownfield site" means real property, the development, expansion, redevelopment, or reuse of which will be complicated by the presence of a substantial amount of one or more hazardous substances, pollutants, or contaminants, as designated by the United States environmental protection agency.

(3.3) "Business concern" has the same meaning as "business" as set forth in section 24-56-102 (1), C.R.S.

(3.5) "Displaced person" has the same meaning as set forth in section 24-56-102 (2), C.R.S., and for purposes of this part 1 shall also include any individual, family, or business concern displaced by the acquisition by eminent domain of real property by an authority.

(3.7) "Governing body" means the governing body of the municipality within which an authority has been established in accordance with the requirements of this part 1.

"Obligee" means any bondholder, agent, or trustee for any bondholder, or any lessor demising to an authority property used in connection with an urban renewal project of the authority, or any assignee of such lessor's interest or any part thereof, and the federal government when it is a party to any contract or agreement with the authority.

"Public body" means the state of Colorado or any municipality, quasi-municipal corporation, board, commission, authority, or other political subdivision or public corporate body of the state.

"Real property" means lands, lands under water, structures, and any and all easements, franchises, incorporeal hereditaments, and every estate and right therein, legal and equitable, including terms for years and liens by way of judgment, mortgage, or otherwise.

"Slum area" means an area in which there is a predominance of buildings or improvements, whether residential or nonresidential, and which, by reason of dilapidation, deterioration, age or obsolescence, inadequate provision for ventilation, light, air, sanitation, or open spaces, high density of population and overcrowding, or the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire or other causes, or any combination of such factors, is conducive to ill health, transmission of disease, infant mortality, juvenile delinquency, or crime and is detrimental to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare.

(7.5) "Urban-level development" means an area in which there is a predominance of either permanent structures or above-ground or at-grade infrastructure.

"Urban renewal area" means a slum area, or a blighted area, or a combination thereof which the local governing body designates as appropriate for an urban renewal project.

(8.5) "Urban renewal authority" or "authority" means a corporate body organized pursuant to the provisions of this part 1 for the purposes, with the powers, and subject to the restrictions set forth in this part 1.

"Urban renewal plan" means a plan, as it exists from time to time, for an urban renewal project, which plan conforms to a general or master plan for the physical development of the municipality as a whole and which is sufficiently complete to indicate such land acquisition, demolition and removal of structures, redevelopment, improvements, and rehabilitation as may be proposed to be carried out in the urban renewal area, zoning and planning changes, if any, land uses, maximum densities, building requirements, and the plan's relationship to definite local objectives respecting appropriate land uses, improved traffic, public transportation, public utilities, recreational and community facilities, and other public improvements.

"Urban renewal project" means undertakings and activities for the elimination and for the prevention of the development or spread of slums and blight and may involve slum clearance and redevelopment, or rehabilitation, or conservation, or any combination or part thereof, in accordance with an urban renewal plan. Such undertakings and activities may include:

Acquisition of a slum area or a blighted area or portion thereof;

Demolition and removal of buildings and improvements;

Installation, construction, or reconstruction of streets, utilities, parks, playgrounds, and other improvements necessary for carrying out the objectives of this part 1 in accordance with the urban renewal plan;

Disposition of any property acquired or held by the authority as a part of its undertaking of the urban renewal project for the urban renewal areas (including sale, initial leasing, or temporary retention by the authority itself) at the fair value of such property for uses in accordance with the urban renewal plan;

Carrying out plans for a program through voluntary action and the regulatory process for the repair, alteration, and rehabilitation of buildings or other improvements in accordance with the urban renewal plan; and

Acquisition of any other property where necessary to eliminate unhealthful, unsanitary, or unsafe conditions, lessen density, eliminate obsolete or other uses detrimental to the public welfare, or otherwise remove or prevent the spread of blight or deterioration or to provide land for needed public facilities.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1159, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(2) amended, p. 529, § 1, effective May 3.

L. 2004:

(2)(f), (2)(h), (2)(j), (2)(k), and (2)(l) amended and (2)(k.5), (3.3), (3.5), and (3.7) added, p. 1745, §§ 3, 2, effective June 4.

L. 2005:

IP(10) amended, p. 1264, § 3, effective June 3.

L. 2010:

(1) amended and (3.1), (7.5), and (8.5) added, (HB 10-1107), ch. 89, p. 298, § 2, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-103 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-104. Urban renewal authority.

Any twenty-five registered electors of the municipality may file a petition with the clerk, setting forth that there is a need for an authority to function in the municipality. Upon the filing of such a petition, the clerk shall give notice of the time, place, and purpose of a public hearing, at which the local governing body will determine the need for such an authority in the municipality. Such notice shall be given at the expense of the municipality by publishing a notice, at least ten days preceding the day on which the hearing is to be held, in a newspaper having a general circulation in the municipality or, if there is no such newspaper, by posting such a notice in at least three public places within the municipality at least ten days preceding the day on which the hearing is to be held.

Upon the date fixed for said hearing held upon notice as provided in this section, a full opportunity to be heard shall be granted to all residents and taxpayers of the municipality and to all other interested persons. After such a hearing, if the governing body finds that one or more slum or blighted areas exist in the municipality, and finds that the acquisition, clearance, rehabilitation, conservation, development, or redevelopment, or a combination thereof of such area is necessary in the interest of the public health, safety, morals, or welfare of the residents of the municipality, and declares it to be in the public interest that the urban renewal authority for such municipality created by this part 1 exercise the powers provided in this part 1 to be exercised by such authority, the governing body shall adopt a resolution so finding and declaring and shall cause notice of such resolution to be given to the mayor, who shall thereupon appoint, as provided in paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section, commissioners to act as an authority. A certificate signed by such commissioners shall then be filed with the division of local government in the department of local affairs and there remain of record, setting forth that the governing body made the findings and declaration provided in this paragraph (b) after such hearing and that the mayor has appointed them as commissioners. Upon the filing of such certificate, the commissioners and their successors are constituted an urban renewal authority, which shall be a body corporate and politic. The boundaries of such authority shall be coterminous with those of the municipality.

If the governing body, after a hearing, determines that the findings and declaration enumerated in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1) cannot be made, it shall adopt a resolution denying the petition. After six months have expired from the date of the denial of such petition, subsequent petitions may be filed and new hearings and determinations made thereon; except that there shall be at least six months between the time of filing of any subsequent petition and the denial of the last preceding petition.

In any suit, action, or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of any bond, contract, mortgage, trust indenture, or other agreement of the authority, the authority shall be conclusively deemed to have been established in accordance with the provisions of this part 1 upon proof of the filing of said certificate. A copy of such certificate, duly certified by the director of the division of local government, shall be admissible in evidence in any such suit, action, or proceeding.

Except as provided in subsection (2.5) of this section, an authority consists of thirteen commissioners, not fewer than ten of whom must be appointed by the mayor, who shall designate the chairperson for the first year. In order to represent the collective interests of the county and all taxing bodies levying a mill levy in one or more urban renewal areas managed by the authority, referred to in this part 1 as an "urban renewal authority area", other than the municipality, one such commissioner on the authority must be appointed by the board of county commissioners of the county in which the territorial boundaries of the urban renewal authority area are located, one such commissioner must also be a board member of a special district selected by agreement of the special districts levying a mill levy within the boundaries of the urban renewal authority area, and one commissioner must also be an elected member of a board of education of a school district levying a mill levy within the boundaries of the urban renewal authority area. If the urban renewal authority area is located within the boundaries of more than one county, the appointment is made by agreement of all of the counties in which the boundaries of the urban renewal authority area are located.
(2) (a) (I) Except as provided in subsection (2.5) of this section, an authority consists of thirteen commissioners, not fewer than ten of whom must be appointed by the mayor, who shall designate the chairperson for the first year. In order to represent the collective interests of the county and all taxing bodies levying a mill levy in one or more urban renewal areas managed by the authority, referred to in this part 1 as an "urban renewal authority area", other than the municipality, one such commissioner on the authority must be appointed by the board of county commissioners of the county in which the territorial boundaries of the urban renewal authority area are located, one such commissioner must also be a board member of a special district selected by agreement of the special districts levying a mill levy within the boundaries of the urban renewal authority area, and one commissioner must also be an elected member of a board of education of a school district levying a mill levy within the boundaries of the urban renewal authority area. If the urban renewal authority area is located within the boundaries of more than one county, the appointment is made by agreement of all of the counties in which the boundaries of the urban renewal authority area are located.

If no county, special district, or school district appoints a commissioner to the authority, then the county, special district, or school district appointment remains vacant until such time as the applicable appointing authority makes the appointment pursuant to this paragraph (a).

If the appointing county is a city and county, the requirements of this paragraph (a) pertaining to county representation on the authority board need not be satisfied.

All mayoral appointments and chair designations are subject to approval by the governing body of the municipality within which the authority has been established. Not more than one of the commissioners appointed by the mayor may be an official of the municipality.

In the event that an official of the municipality is appointed as commissioner of an authority, acceptance or retention of such appointment is not deemed a forfeiture of his or her office, or incompatible therewith, and does not affect his or her tenure or compensation in any way. The term of office of a commissioner of an authority who is a municipal official is not affected or curtailed by the expiration of the term of his or her municipal office.

The commissioners who are first appointed must be designated by the mayor to serve for staggered terms so that the term of at least one commissioner will expire each year. Thereafter, the term of office is five years. A commissioner holds office until his or her successor has been appointed and has qualified. Vacancies other than by reason of expiration of terms must be filled by the mayor for the unexpired term; except that, in the case of a commissioner on the authority who has been appointed by the board of commissioners of a county pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), a vacancy on the authority board for the balance of the unexpired term must be filled by the board of commissioners of the county that made the original appointment, a vacancy of the special-district appointed seat must be filled by agreement of the affected special districts, and a vacancy of the school-district appointed seat must be filled by agreement of the affected school districts. A majority of the commissioners constitutes a quorum. The mayor shall file with the clerk a certificate of the appointment or reappointment of any commissioner, and such certificate is conclusive evidence of the due and proper appointment of such commissioner. A commissioner receives no compensation for his or her services, but is entitled to the necessary expenses, including traveling expenses, incurred in the discharge of his or her duties.

When the office of the first chairman of the authority becomes vacant and annually thereafter, the authority shall select a chairman from among its members. An authority shall select from among its members a vice-chairman, and it may employ a secretary, who shall be executive director, technical experts, and such other officers, agents, and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, and it shall determine their qualifications, duties, and compensation. An authority may call upon the municipal counsel or chief legal officer of the municipality for such legal services as it may require, or it may employ its own counsel and legal staff. An authority may delegate to one or more of its agents or employees such duties as it deems proper.

(2.5) When the governing body of a municipality designates itself as the authority or transfers an existing authority to the governing body pursuant to section 31-25-115 (1), an authority consists of the same number of commissioners as the number of members of the governing body. In addition, in order to represent the collective interests of the county and all taxing bodies levying a mill levy within the boundaries of the urban renewal authority area other than the municipality, one additional commissioner on the authority must be appointed by the board of county commissioners of the county in which the territorial boundaries of the urban renewal authority area are located, one additional commissioner must also be a board member of a special district selected by agreement of the special districts levying a mill levy within the boundaries of the urban renewal authority area, and one additional commissioner must also be an elected member of a board of education of a school district levying a mill levy within the boundaries of the urban renewal authority area. If the number of members of the governing body causes the authority to have an even number of commissioners, the mayor shall appoint an additional commissioner to restore an odd number of commissioners to the authority. As applicable, the appointment of the county, special district, and school district representatives on the authority pursuant to this subsection (2.5) must be made in accordance with the procedures specified in subsection (2) of this section.

No commissioner, other officer, or employee of an authority nor any immediate member of the family of any such commissioner, officer, or employee shall acquire any interest, direct or indirect, in any project or in any property included or planned to be included in any project, nor shall he have any interest, direct or indirect, in any contract or proposed contract for materials or services to be furnished or used in connection with any project. If any commissioner, other officer, or employee of an authority owns or controls an interest, direct or indirect, in any property included or planned to be included in any project, he shall immediately disclose the same in writing to the authority, and such disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the authority. Upon such disclosure, such commissioner, officer, or other employee shall not participate in any action by the authority affecting the carrying out of the project planning or the undertaking of the project unless the authority determines that, in the light of such personal interest, the participation of such member in any such act would not be contrary to the public interest. Acquisition or retention of any such interest without such determination by the authority that it is not contrary to the public interest or willful failure to disclose any such interest constitutes misconduct in office.

The mayor, with the consent of the governing body, may remove a commissioner for inefficiency or neglect of duty or misconduct in office but only after the commissioner has been given a copy of the charges made by the mayor against him and has had an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel before the governing body. In the event of the removal of any commissioner, the mayor shall file in the office of the clerk a record of the proceedings, together with the charges made against the commissioner and findings thereon.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1161, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 76:

(1)(b) and (1)(d) amended, p. 597, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

(2)(a) and (2)(b) amended and (2.5) added, (HB 15-1348), ch. 261, p. 984, § 1, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-104 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-25-105. Powers of an authority.

Every authority has all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this part 1, including, but not limited to, the following powers in addition to others granted in this part 1:

To sue and to be sued; to adopt and have a seal and to alter the same at pleasure; to have perpetual succession; to make, and from time to time amend and repeal, bylaws, orders, rules, and regulations to effectuate the provisions of this part 1;

To undertake urban renewal projects and to make and execute any and all contracts and other instruments which it may deem necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers under this part 1, including, but not limited to, contracts for advances, loans, grants, and contributions from the federal government or any other source;

To arrange for the furnishing or repair by any person or public body of services, privileges, works, streets, roads, public utilities, or educational or other facilities for or in connection with a project of the authority; to dedicate property acquired or held by it for public works, improvements, facilities, utilities, and purposes; and to agree, in connection with any of its contracts, to any conditions that it deems reasonable and appropriate under this part 1, including, but not limited to, conditions attached to federal financial assistance, and to include in any contract made or let in connection with any project of the authority provisions to fulfill such of said conditions as it may deem reasonable and appropriate;

To arrange with the municipality or other public body to plan, replan, zone, or rezone any part of the area of the municipality or of such other public body, as the case may be, in connection with any project proposed or being undertaken by the authority under this part 1;

To enter, with the consent of the owner, upon any building or property in order to make surveys or appraisals and to obtain an order for this purpose from a court of competent jurisdiction in the event entry is denied or resisted; to acquire any property by purchase, lease, option, gift, grant, bequest, devise, or otherwise to acquire any interest in property by condemnation, including a fee simple absolute title thereto, in the manner provided by the laws of this state for the exercise of the power of eminent domain by any other public body (and property already devoted to a public use may be acquired in a like manner except that no property belonging to the federal government or to a public body may be acquired without its consent); except that any acquisition of any interest in property by condemnation by an authority must be approved as part of an urban renewal plan or substantial modification thereof, as provided in section 31-25-107, by a majority vote of the governing body of the municipality in which such property is located, and the acquisition of property by condemnation by an authority shall also satisfy the requirements of section 31-25-105.5; to hold, improve, clear, or prepare for redevelopment any such property; to mortgage, pledge, hypothecate, or otherwise encumber or dispose of its property; and to insure or provide for the insurance of any property or operations of the authority against any risks or hazards; except that no provision of any other law with respect to the planning or undertaking of projects or the acquisition, clearance, or disposition of property by public bodies shall restrict an authority exercising powers under this part 1 in the exercise of such functions with respect to a project of such authority unless the general assembly specifically so states;

To invest any of its funds not required for immediate disbursement in property or in securities in which public bodies may legally invest funds subject to their control pursuant to part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S., and to redeem such bonds as it has issued at the redemption price established therein or to purchase such bonds at less than redemption price, all such bonds so redeemed or purchased to be canceled;

To deposit any funds not required for immediate disbursement in any depository authorized in section 24-75-603, C.R.S. For the purpose of making such deposits, the authority may appoint, by written resolution, one or more persons to act as custodians of the funds of the authority. Such persons shall give surety bonds in such amounts and form and for such purposes as the authority requires.

To borrow money and to apply for and accept advances, loans, grants, and contributions from the federal government or other source for any of the purposes of this part 1 and to give such security as may be required;

To make such appropriations and expenditures of its funds and to set up, establish, and maintain such general, separate, or special funds and bank accounts or other accounts as it deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this part 1;

To make or have made and to submit or resubmit to the governing body for appropriate action the authority's proposed plans and modifications thereof necessary to the carrying out of the purposes of this part 1, such plan shall include, but not be limited to:

Plans to assist the municipality in the latter's preparation of a workable program for utilizing appropriate private and public resources to eliminate and prevent the development or spread of slum and blighted areas, to encourage needed urban rehabilitation, to provide for the redevelopment of slum and blighted areas, or to undertake such activities or other feasible municipal activities as may be suitably employed to achieve the objectives of such workable program, which program may include, without limitation, provision for: The prevention of the spread of blight into areas of the municipality which are free from blight through diligent enforcement of housing, zoning, and occupancy controls and standards; the rehabilitation or conservation of slum and blighted areas or portions thereof by replanning, removing congestion, providing public improvements, and encouraging rehabilitation and repair of deteriorated or deteriorating structures; and the clearance and redevelopment of slum and blighted areas or portions thereof;

Urban renewal plans;

Preliminary plans outlining proposed urban renewal activities for neighborhoods of the municipality to embrace two or more urban renewal areas;

Plans for the relocation of those individuals, families, and business concerns situated in the urban renewal area which will be displaced by the urban renewal project, which relocation plans, without limitation, may include appropriate data setting forth a feasible method for the temporary relocation of such individuals and families and showing that there will be provided, in the urban renewal area or in other areas not generally less desirable in regard to public utilities and public and commercial facilities and at rents or prices within the financial means of the individuals and families so displaced, decent, safe, and sanitary dwellings equal in number to the number of and available to such individuals and families and reasonably accessible to their places of employment;

Plans for undertaking a program of voluntary repair and rehabilitation of buildings and improvements and for the enforcement of state and local laws, codes, and regulations relating to the use of land and the use and occupancy of buildings and improvements and to the repair, rehabilitation, demolition, or removal of buildings and improvements;

Financing plans, maps, plats, appraisals, title searches, surveys, studies, and other preliminary plans and work necessary or pertinent to any proposed plans or modifications;

To make reasonable relocation payments to or with respect to individuals, families, and business concerns situated in an urban renewal area that will be displaced as provided in subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (i) of this subsection (1) for moving expenses and actual direct losses of property including, for business concerns, goodwill and lost profits that are reasonably related to relocation of the business, resulting from their displacement for which reimbursement or compensation is not otherwise made, including the making of such payments financed by the federal government;

To develop, test, and report methods and techniques and to carry out demonstrations and other activities for the prevention and the elimination of slum and blighted areas within the municipality;

To rent or to provide by any other means suitable quarters for the use of the authority or to accept the use of such quarters as may be furnished by the municipality or any other public body, and to equip such quarters with such furniture, furnishings, equipment, records, and supplies as the authority may deem necessary to enable it to exercise its powers under this part 1.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1163, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(1)(f) amended, p. 1619, § 21, effective June 8.

L. 89:

(1)(f)(I) amended, p. 1115, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(1)(e) amended, p. 1480, § 1, effective April 5.

L. 99:

(1)(j) amended, p. 530, § 2, effective May 3.

L. 2004:

(1)(e) amended, p. 1746, § 4, effective June 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-105 as it existed prior to 1975.